Mississippi, session 2026, HB153.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  It is the intent of the Legislature to establish a program to ensure early notification of and early commitment to college opportunities for students in middle school and high school and their families.  It is the intent of the Legislature that the program motivate students to stay in school, graduate from high school, take college preparatory coursework, and, if they choose to do so, seek postsecondary opportunities. SECTION 2.  The Early Commitment to College Program is established for the purpose of accomplishing all of the following goals: (a)  Increase high school completion rates, direct college-going rates, and college preparation of students attending schools with the greatest poverty and low-income students in general; (b)  Motivate students to prepare for college by taking college preparatory coursework, which may include career technical coursework and the course requirements for admission to any state institution of higher learning under the authority of the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning; (c)  Help families understand that college is attainable and affordable, that financial aid is available, and that with adequate preparation their children can go to college if they choose to do so; (d)  Provide a clear path and direct assistance for students through middle schools, high schools, community colleges, universities, and state and federal financial aid programs, thereby improving opportunity and efficiency; and (e)  Prepare the highly skilled workforce necessary to keep Mississippi's economy competitive, maintain the income and quality of life for Mississippi residents, increase tax revenues, and provide for improved civic and democratic participation. SECTION 3.  (1)  As used in this act, the following phrases have the meanings ascribed in this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise: (a)  "College Opportunity Zone" means a school in an "F" school district, as designated by the State Board of Education, which maintains any combination of sixth, seventh, eighth and ninth grades, with a high proportion of low-income students. (b) "Low-income student" means a student who is eligible for free or reduced-price lunches. (2) A school or school district assigned an accountability rating of "F" must be designated as a College Opportunity Zone and provide all students enrolled in sixth through ninth grades and their parents and guardians the opportunity to sign a "Save Me a Spot in College" pledge. (3) A school in a participating school district not designated as a College Opportunity Zone may give a student in sixth, seventh, eighth or ninth grade who is eligible for free and reduced-price lunches and his or her parent or guardian the opportunity to sign a Save Me a Spot in College pledge. (4) A designated school or school district shall certify that a student has completed the Save Me a Spot in College pledge and shall track students enrolled in the Early Commitment to College Program by recording and reporting participation and outcome data, as directed by the State Department of Education. (5) Any school that has students who are eligible for free or reduced-price lunches in the National School Lunch Program may participate in the Early Commitment to College Program. SECTION 4.  The State Department of Education shall perform the following duties and responsibilities: (a) Identifying schools as College Opportunity Zones; (b) Developing the Save Me a Spot in College pledge, which must include the commitments made by the student and the major postsecondary and financial aid opportunities provided by the state.  The pledge must contain all of the following assurances: (i) A student who signs the pledge and enrolls in the Early Commitment to College Program, in the same manner as all other students, is eligible to continue his or her postsecondary education at a campus of a Mississippi public community or junior college to pursue a career technical education or an associate degree, or to prepare for transfer to a four-year state institution of higher learning, or, if he or she meets the admission requirements and applies for admission, at a state institution of higher learning; (ii) A student who signs the pledge must receive, upon enrollment at a public community or junior college or state institution of higher learning, a fee waiver for two (2) or more years of enrollment at the public community or junior college or state institution of higher learning, as long as the student is a Mississippi resident and continues to show financial need on a completed Free Application for Federal Student Aid; (c) Consulting with the State Board for Community Colleges and the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning, presidents of state institutions of higher learning, community and junior colleges and independent colleges and universities in developing the pledge, letter and supporting materials, including a method for participating school districts to notify the postsecondary educational institutions in their service area that the local school district is participating in the program and seeking partnerships with postsecondary educational institutions and others to plan and conduct activities to implement the program; (d) Determining the form of recognition for a student who has been certified by his or her school district as having fulfilled the requirements of the pledge, as required under subsection (4) of Section 3 of this act; (e) Developing a method by which participating schools shall record and report participation in, and outcome data of, the Early Commitment to College Program to the superintendent, as required under subsection (4) of Section 3 of this act; (f) Developing a letter addressed to students enrolled in sixth through ninth grades and their parents or guardians, and signed by the State Superintendent of Public Education and the superintendent of the local school district, which describes the major steps to prepare for college, including postsecondary career technical education, and the major postsecondary and financial aid opportunities available to students in Mississippi; (g) Developing a second letter signed by the State Superintendent of Public Education and the superintendent of the local school district, to be directed to students eligible to sign the pledge under Section 3 of this act, and their parents or guardians, which details the Early Commitment to College Program, including the pledge, in addition to the information in the letter directed to all students in sixth through ninth grades; and (h) Making both letters and information on the Early Commitment to College Program available on the department's website and requiring each school district to distribute the letters as appropriate through existing means to all students and their parents. SECTION 5.  (1)  A student who signs a pledge declares a commitment to prepare for college, finish high school and enroll in college and commits to: (a) Meeting all graduation requirements to finish high school in Mississippi; (b) Enrolling in college preparatory coursework, which may include career technical coursework and the course requirements for admission to a public community or junior college or state institution of higher learning; (c) Seeking to achieve proficiency in mathematics, reading and writing in English, as demonstrated by results on the statewide assessment testing required under Section 37-16-3; (d) Completing and filing a Free Application for Federal Student Aid and submitting his or her grade point average to the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning and the State Board for Community Colleges by March 2 of his or her senior year; and (e) Meeting application and other requirements for university admission or enrolling directly in community college within twelve (12) months after high school graduation. (2) School districts that choose to participate in the voluntary Early Commitment to College Program shall provide information and services, through existing programs to students, not exclusive of those who sign the pledge, through their middle school and high school years.  These services must include the following: (a) At the time of enrollment, each student must receive a certificate of participation in the Early Commitment to College Program, with his or her name, and bearing the signature of the State Superintendent of Public Education and the superintendent of the local school district; (b) Participating students also must receive a booklet of college information providing more specific information about eligibility requirements, preparation steps and other pertinent information; (c) Transcript review and academics assessment, leading to course planning for the student at the time of enrollment in the Early Commitment to College Program and annual reporting to the student and his or her parent or guardian on how he or she is performing relative to state standards and other benchmarks; (d) A visit to at least one (1) community or junior college, including, but not limited to, exposure to career technical education and transfer programs, and where geographically feasible, at least one (1) state institution of higher learning while the student is in ninth or tenth grade; (e) Information on college admissions tests in eleventh grade; (f) Information on college admission and community or junior college enrollment procedures in twelfth grade; (g) Information on the financial aid application process, including, but not limited to, the Free Application for Federal Student Aid and grade point average verification in twelfth grade; and (h) Information communicating that a student who has signed the pledge and transfers out of a designated school or school district may not receive the recognition set forth in Section 4(d) unless he or she attends another school district that is designated as a College Opportunity Zone and participating in the program.  The student's new school district may obtain the student's record of participation in the program from the original school district or the student may request to sign the pledge again, including after ninth grade, only if he or she provides documentation that he or she was enrolled in the program in his or her original school district. SECTION 6.  (1)  The Legislature authorizes the State Department of Education, the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning, the State Board for Community Colleges, independent colleges and universities and other nonprofits, businesses, or other community organizations to provide support services as needed in coordination with local school districts. (2) This act does not prohibit state institutions of higher learning and private institutions of higher education from maintaining existing, or entering into new supplemental agreements, with school districts and their students to offer a guarantee of admission, supplemental services, supplemental financial aid or other opportunities for alignment of prerequisites or curriculum. SECTION 7.  (1)  Before November 1, 2033, the State Department of Education shall submit to the Legislature a report on the status of the program, including, but not limited to, the following: (a) The number of school districts and students participating in the program; (b) The number of participating students who fulfilled the requirements of the pledge required under subsection (4) of Section 3 of this act; and (c) Any relevant outcome data reported by local school districts to the State Department of Education under subsection (4) of Section 3 of this act. (2) As part of this report, the department shall provide a recommendation on whether the program should be continued. SECTION 8.  Sections 1 through 8 of this act shall stand repealed on July 1, 2035. SECTION 9.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.